Illinois, session 104th, HB1782.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 500-135 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/500-135)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)8    Sec. 500-135. Fees. 9    (a) The fees required by this Article are as follows:10        (1) a fee of $215 for a person who is a resident of 11    Illinois, and $380 for a person who is not a resident of 12    Illinois, payable once every 2 years for an insurance 13    producer license;14        (2) a fee of $50 for the issuance of a temporary 15    insurance producer license;16        (3) a fee of $150 payable once every 2 years for a 17    business entity;18        (4) an annual $50 fee for a limited line producer 19    license issued under items (1) through (8) of subsection 20    (a) of Section 500-100;21        (5) a $50 application fee for the processing of a 22    request to take the written examination for an insurance 23    producer license;  HB1782 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 08992 BAB 19048 b1        (6) an annual registration fee of $1,000 for 2    registration of an education provider based in the State 3    of Illinois, and $2,000 for registration of an education 4    provider that is not based in the State of Illinois;5        (7) a certification fee of $50 for each certified 6    pre-licensing or continuing education course and an annual 7    fee of $20 for renewing the certification of each such 8    course;9        (8) a fee of $215 for a person who is a resident of 10    Illinois, and $380 for a person who is not a resident of 11    Illinois, payable once every 2 years for a car rental 12    limited line license;13        (9) a fee of $200 payable once every 2 years for a 14    limited lines license other than the licenses issued under 15    items (1) through (8) of subsection (a) of Section 16    500-100, a car rental limited line license, or a 17    self-service storage facility limited line license;18        (10) a fee of $50 payable once every 2 years for a 19    self-service storage facility limited line license.20    (a-5) Beginning on July 1, 2021, an amount equal to the 21additional amount of revenue collected under paragraphs (1) 22and (8) of subsection (a) as a result of the increase in the 23fees under this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly 24shall be transferred annually, with 10% of that amount paid 25into the State Police Law Enforcement Administration Fund and 2690% of that amount paid into the Law Enforcement Training   HB1782 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 08992 BAB 19048 b1Fund. 2    (b) Except as otherwise provided, all fees paid to and 3collected by the Director under this Section shall be paid 4promptly after receipt thereof, together with a detailed 5statement of such fees, into a special fund in the State 6Treasury to be known as the Insurance Producer Administration 7Fund. The moneys deposited into the Insurance Producer 8Administration Fund may be used only for payment of the 9expenses of the Department in the execution, administration, 10and enforcement of the insurance laws of this State, and shall 11be appropriated as otherwise provided by law for the payment 12of those expenses with first priority being any expenses 13incident to or associated with the administration and 14enforcement of this Article.15(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 103-609, eff. 7-1-24.)